Georgia, session 2025_26, HB391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to professions and businesses,
is amended in Code Section 43-4B-1, relating to definitions, by revising paragraph (1) as
follows:
"(1) 'Amateur,' when applied to a person engaged in boxing, wrestling, or a martial art,
means a person who receives no compensation and engages in a match, contest, or
exhibition of boxing, wrestling, or a martial art that is governed or authorized by:
(A) U.S.A. Boxing;
(B) The Georgia High School Athletic Association;
(C) The National Collegiate Athletic Association;
H. B. 391
- 1 -

LC 55 0443
(D) Amateur Athletic Union;
(E) Golden Gloves;
(F) Team Georgia Amateur Wrestling;
(G) USA Wrestling;
(H) National High School Coaches Association;
(I) North American Sport Karate Association;
(J) International Sport Kick Boxing/Karate Association;
(K) World Kick Boxing Association;
(L) United States Kick Boxing Association;
(M) International Sport Combat Federation;
(N)(J) Professional Karate Commission; or
(O) International Kick Boxing Federation; or
(P)(K) The local affiliate of any organization listed in this paragraph."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 43-4B-2, relating to
application of provisions of such chapter, as follows:
"(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to apply to any match, contest,
or exhibition:
(1) In which the contestants are all amateurs; and
(2) Which is governed or authorized by:
(A) U.S.A. Boxing;
(B) The Georgia High School Athletic Association;
(C) The National Collegiate Athletic Association;
(D) Amateur Athletic Union;
(E) Golden Gloves;
(F) Team Georgia Amateur Wrestling;
H. B. 391
- 2 -

LC 55 0443
(G) USA Wrestling;
(H) National High School Coaches Association;
(I) North American Sport Karate Association;
(J) International Sport Kick Boxing/Karate Association;
(K) World Kick Boxing Association;
(L) United States Kick Boxing Association;
(M) International Sport Combat Federation;
(N)(J) Professional Karate Commission; or
(O) International Kick Boxing Federation; or
(P)(K) The local affiliate of any organization listed in this paragraph."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 391
- 3 -